Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.480

Revoke.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1439-S.SL) ***

"Revoke," in all its forms, means the invalidation for a period of one calendar year and thereafter until reissue. However, under the provisions of RCW 46.20.285, 46.20.311, 46.20.265, or 46.61.5055, and chapters 46.32 and 46.65 RCW, the invalidation may last for a period other than one calendar year.

[2007 c 419 s 4; 1995 c 332 s 10; 1994 c 275 s 38; 1988 c 148 s 8; 1985 c 407 s 1; 1983 c 165 s 14; 1983 c 165 s 13; 1979 c 62 s 7; 1961 c 12 s 46.04.480. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 52; prior: (i) 1943 c 153 s 1, part; 1937 c 188 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6312-1, part. (ii) 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—2007 c 419: See notes following RCW 46.16A.010.

Severability—Effective dates—1995 c 332: See notes following RCW 46.20.308.

Short title—Effective date—1994 c 275: See notes following RCW 46.04.015.

Legislative finding—Severability—1988 c 148: See notes following RCW 13.40.265.

Effective dates—1985 c 407: "Sections 2 and 4 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1985. The remainder of the act shall take effect January 1, 1986." [1985 c 407 s 8.]

Legislative finding, intent—Effective dates—Severability—1983 c 165: See notes following RCW 46.20.308.

Severability—1979 c 62: See note following RCW 46.65.020.